Maryland, session 2026, SB0227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
26–301.
(b) Subject to [subsection (c)] SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (C–1) of this section, any
State agency authorized by law and any political subdivision of this State may adopt
ordinances or regulations that:
(1) Regulate the parking of vehicles;
(2) Provide for the impounding of vehicles parked in violation of the
ordinances or regulations;
(3) Regulate the towing of vehicles from publicly owned and privately
owned parking lots; and
(4) Provide for the issuance of a citation by an officer for a violation of an
ordinance or regulation that is adopted under this section.
(c) A political subdivision may not adopt or enforce an ordinance or regulation
that prohibits the parking of more than one motorcycle within a space served by a single
parking meter.
(C–1) (1) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY NOT ADOPT OR ENFORCE AN
ORDINANCE, A REGULATION, OR A POLICY THAT REQUIRES PAYMENT OF A FEE FOR
PARKING A MOTOR VEHICLE IN AN ON–STREET PARKING SPACE SERVED BY A
PARKING METER IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE HAS DISABLED VETERAN SPECIAL
REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) A STATE AGENCY MAY NOT ADOPT OR ENFORCE A REGULATION
OR A POLICY THAT REQUIRES PAYMENT OF A FEE FOR PARKING A MOTOR VEHICLE
IN A PARKING LOT OWNED OR CONTROLLED BY THE STATE AGENCY IF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE HAS DISABLED VETERAN SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.